New York, session 2025-2026, A4768.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The general business law is amended by adding a new section 2 396-pp to read as follows: 3 § 396-pp. Spare tire requirement. 1. All new motor vehicles sold or 4 leased at new motor vehicle dealerships shall include a spare tire, 5 whether or not equipped with standard radial or run-flat tires. 6 2. For the purposes of this section, a run-flat tire is a pneumatic 7 vehicle tire designed to resist the effects of deflation when punctured, 8 allowing the vehicle to continue to be driven at reduced speeds for 9 limited distances, but cannot replace a spare tire for safety and a 10 longer than expected journey to a repair shop. 11 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07304-02-6